Yamls-norm/N-etu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - etu: # Noun  'eng basket, pt ' - partial paradigm
# 
     etu+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: oetu # my basket
     etu+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: eetu # your(sg) basket
     etu+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ietu # his/her basket
     etu+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3c: seetu # his/her basket
     etu+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl12: kietu # our basket
     etu+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: oseetu # our basket
     etu+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: eyaretu # your(pl) basket
     etu+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: teyaretu # their basket
     etu+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3c: seteyaretu # their basket
# 
     etu+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: oetueri # my basket
     etu+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: eetueri # your(sg) basket
     etu+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ietueri # his/her basket
     etu+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3c: seetueri # his/her basket
     etu+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl12: kietueri # our basket
     etu+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: oseetueri # our basket
     etu+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: eyaretueri # your(pl) basket
     etu+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: teyaretueri # their basket
     etu+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3c: seteyaretueri # their basket
